Wyoming statutes. Title 12 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 5. Habitual Drunkards and Minors

§ 12-5-501.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1979, ch. 156, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1935, ch. 87, § 9, related to general restrictions.

§ 12-5-502.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1935, ch. 87, § 26; C.S. 1945, § 53-226; W.S. 1957, § 12-34; Laws 1973, ch. 213, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 12-2-136; Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1; 1988, ch. 44, § 1; repealed by 2014 ch. 110, § 104, effective July 1, 2014.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1935, ch. 87, § 26, related to liability for sale to child, ward or habitual drunkard when written notice thereof given.